Utah statutes.
26-3-4.   Quality and publication of statistics.
The department shall:
(1)  take such actions as may be necessary to assure that statistics developed
under this chapter are of high quality, timely, and comprehensive, as well as
specific, standardized, and adequately analyzed and indexed; and
(2)  publish, make available, and disseminate such statistics on as wide a
basis as practicable.
